District of Columbia statutes.
5-107.01

Minimum standards for members of the Metropolitan Police Department.

(a)

Repealed.

(b)

Repealed.

(c)

Repealed.

(d)

Repealed.

(e)

As of March 6, 2007, to be eligible for appointment as a sworn member of the Metropolitan Police Department, an applicant shall have either:

(1)

Successfully completed 60 hours of post-secondary education at an accredited college or university;

(2)

Served in the Armed Forces of the United States, including the Organized Reserves and National Guard, for at least 3 years on active duty and if separated from the military, have received an honorable discharge; or

(3)

Served at least 5 years in a full-duty status with a full-service police department in a municipality or state within the United States and have resigned or retired in good standing.

History

Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-160, § 202, 47 DCR 4619
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-194, § 702(a), 51 DCR 9406
Mar. 6, 2007, D.C. Law 16-223, § 201(a), 53 DCR 10221

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-194 rewrote subsec. (a) and added subsec. (d). Prior to amendment, subsec. (a) had read as follows: “(a) To be eligible for appointment as a sworn member of the Metropolitan Police Department, as of December 31, 2003, an applicant must have successfully completed 2 years of post-secondary education.”
D.C. Law 16-223, repealed subsecs. (a) to (d), and added subsec. (e).

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Metropolitan Police Department Education Requirement Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-147, April 22, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 4931).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Metropolitan Police Department Educational Requirement Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-323, January 28, 2004, 51 DCR 1586).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3 of the Metropolitan Police Department Officer Retention and Recruitment Incentives Emergency Amendment Act of 2016 (D.C. Act 21-332, Mar. 17, 2016, 63 DCR 4304).